Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-462.01
Federal regulations; adopted.

For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, the following federal regulations are adopted as Nebraska law as they existed on January 1, 2026:

The parts, subparts, and sections of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as referenced in the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act.

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 20;

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 36;

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 1007, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB239, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 16;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB805, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB212, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 17;

Laws 2013, LB35, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB776, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB313, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB929, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 62;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 74;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 51;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 9;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 46;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 16;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 24;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 36;

Laws 2026, LB781, § 4.
April 15, 2026